Florida, session 2026, SB696.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 495.111, Florida 22 Statutes, is amended to read: 23 495.111âClassification.â 24 (1)âThe department shall, no later than July 1 of each 25 year, adopt as the state classification system the United States 26 Patent and Trademark Officeâs system of classification of goods 27 and services in effect on June 1 of that year. The 28 classification shall be published as part of the trademark 29 registration application as set forth in ss. 495.031 and 30 495.0315. The following general classes of goods and services, 31 conforming to the classification adopted by the United States 32 Patent and Trademark Office, are established for convenience of 33 administration of this chapter: 34 (a)âGoods: 35 1.âClass 1âChemicals for use in industry, science and 36 photography, as well as in agriculture, horticulture and 37 forestry; unprocessed artificial resins, unprocessed plastics; 38 fire extinguishing and fire prevention compositions; tempering 39 and soldering preparations; substances for tanning animal skins 40 and hides; adhesives for use in industry; putties and other 41 paste fillers; compost, manures, fertilizers; biological 42 preparations for use in industry and science. 43 2.âClass 2âPaints, varnishes, lacquers; preservatives 44 against rust and against deterioration of wood; colorants, dyes; 45 inks for printing, marking and engraving; raw natural resins; 46 metals in foil and powder form for use in painting, decorating, 47 printing and art. 48 3.âClass 3âNon-medicated cosmetics and toiletry 49 preparations; non-medicated dentifrices; perfumery, essential 50 oils; bleaching preparations and other substances for laundry 51 use; cleaning, polishing, scouring and abrasive preparations. 52 4.âClass 4âIndustrial oils and greases, wax; lubricants; 53 dust absorbing, wetting and binding compositions; fuels and 54 illuminants; candles and wicks for lighting. 55 5.âClass 5âPharmaceuticals, medical and veterinary 56 preparations; sanitary preparations for medical purposes; 57 dietetic food and substances adapted for medical or veterinary 58 use, food for babies; dietary supplements for humans and 59 animals; plasters, materials for dressings; material for 60 stopping teeth, dental wax; disinfectants; preparations for 61 destroying vermin; fungicides, herbicides. 62 6.âClass 6âCommon metals and their alloys, ores; metal 63 materials for building and construction; transportable buildings 64 of metal; non-electric cables and wires of common metal; small 65 items of metal hardware; metal containers for storage or 66 transport; safes. 67 7.âClass 7âMachines, machine tools, power-operated tools; 68 motors and engines, except for land vehicles; machine coupling 69 and transmission components, except for land vehicles; 70 agricultural implements, other than hand-operated hand tools; 71 incubators for eggs; automatic vending machines. 72 8.âClass 8âHand tools and implements, hand-operated; 73 cutlery; side arms, except firearms; razors. 74 9.âClass 9âScientific, nautical, surveying, photographic, 75 cinematographic, optical, weighing, measuring, signaling, 76 checking (supervision), life-saving and teaching apparatus and 77 instruments; apparatus and instruments for conducting, 78 switching, transforming, accumulating, regulating or controlling 79 electricity; apparatus for recording, transmission or 80 reproduction of sound or images; magnetic data carriers, 81 recording discs; compact discs, DVDs and other digital recording 82 media; mechanisms for coin-operated apparatus; cash registers, 83 calculating machines, data processing equipment, computers; 84 computer software; fire-extinguishing apparatus. 85 10.âClass 10âSurgical, medical, dental and veterinary 86 apparatus and instruments; artificial limbs, eyes and teeth; 87 orthopaedic articles; suture materials; therapeutic and 88 assistive devices adapted for the disabled; massage apparatus; 89 apparatus, devices and articles for nursing infants; sexual 90 activity apparatus, devices and articles. 91 11.âClass 11âApparatus for lighting, heating, steam 92 generating, cooking, refrigerating, drying, ventilating, water 93 supply and sanitary purposes. 94 12.âClass 12âVehicles; apparatus for locomotion by land, 95 air or water. 96 13.âClass 13âFirearms; ammunition and projectiles; 97 explosives; fireworks. 98 14.âClass 14âPrecious metals and their alloys; jewellery, 99 precious and semi-precious stones; horological and chronometric 100 instruments. 101 15.âClass 15âMusical instruments. 102 16.âClass 16âPaper and cardboard; printed matter; 103 bookbinding material; photographs; stationery and office 104 requisites, except furniture; adhesives for stationery or 105 household purposes; drawing materials and materials for artists; 106 paintbrushes; instructional and teaching materials; plastic 107 sheets, films and bags for wrapping and packaging; printersâ 108 type, printing blocks. 109 17.âClass 17âUnprocessed and semi-processed rubber, gutta 110 percha, gum, asbestos, mica and substitutes for all these 111 materials; plastics and resins in extruded form for use in 112 manufacture; packing, stopping and insulating materials; 113 flexible pipes, tubes and hoses, not of metal. 114 18.âClass 18âLeather and imitations of leather; animal 115 skins and hides; luggage and carrying bags; umbrellas and 116 parasols; walking sticks; whips, harness and saddlery; collars, 117 leashes and clothing for animals. 118 19.âClass 19âBuilding materials (non-metallic); non 119 metallic rigid pipes for building; asphalt, pitch and bitumen; 120 non-metallic transportable buildings; monuments, not of metal. 121 20.âClass 20âFurniture, mirrors, picture frames; 122 containers, not of metal, for storage or transport; unworked or 123 semi-worked bone, horn, whalebone or mother-of-pearl; shells; 124 meerschaum; yellow amber. 125 21.âClass 21âHousehold or kitchen utensils and containers; 126 cookware and tableware, except forks, knives and spoons; combs 127 and sponges; brushes, except paintbrushes; brush-making 128 materials; articles for cleaning purposes; unworked or semi 129 worked glass, except building glass; glassware, porcelain and 130 earthenware. 131 22.âClass 22âRopes and string; nets; tents and tarpaulins; 132 awnings of textile or synthetic materials; sails; sacks for the 133 transport and storage of materials in bulk; padding, cushioning 134 and stuffing materials, except of paper, cardboard, rubber or 135 plastics; raw fibrous textile materials and substitutes 136 therefor. 137 23.âClass 23âYarns and threads, for textile use. 138 24.âClass 24âTextiles and substitutes for textiles; 139 household linen; curtains of textile or plastic. 140 25.âClass 25âClothing, footwear, headgear. 141 26.âClass 26âLace and embroidery, ribbons and braid; 142 buttons, hooks and eyes, pins and needles; artificial flowers; 143 hair decorations; false hair. 144 27.âClass 27âCarpets, rugs, mats and matting, linoleum and 145 other materials for covering existing floors; wall hangings 146 (non-textile). 147 28.âClass 28âGames, toys and playthings; video game 148 apparatus; gymnastic and sporting articles; decorations for 149 Christmas trees. 150 29.âClass 29âMeat, fish, poultry and game; meat extracts; 151 preserved, frozen, dried and cooked fruits and vegetables; 152 jellies, jams, compotes; eggs; milk and milk products; oils and 153 fats for food. 154 30.âClass 30âCoffee, tea, cocoa and artificial coffee; 155 rice; tapioca and sago; flour and preparations made from 156 cereals; bread, pastries and confectionery; edible ices; sugar, 157 honey, treacle; yeast, baking-powder; salt; mustard; vinegar, 158 sauces (condiments); spices; ice (frozen water). 159 31.âClass 31âRaw and unprocessed agricultural, 160 aquacultural, horticultural and forestry products; raw and 161 unprocessed grains and seeds; fresh fruits and vegetables, fresh 162 herbs; natural plants and flowers; bulbs, seedlings and seeds 163 for planting; live animals; foodstuffs and beverages for 164 animals; malt. 165 32.âClass 32âBeers; mineral and aerated waters and other 166 non-alcoholic beverages; fruit beverages and fruit juices; 167 syrups and other preparations for making beverages. 168 33.âClass 33âAlcoholic beverages (except beers). 169 34.âClass 34âTobacco; smokersâ articles; matches. 170 (b)âServices: 171 1.âClass 35âAdvertising; business management; business 172 administration; office functions. 173 2.âClass 36âInsurance; financial affairs; monetary 174 affairs; real estate affairs. 175 3.âClass 37âBuilding construction; repair; installation 176 services. 177 4.âClass 38âTelecommunications. 178 5.âClass 39âTransport; packaging and storage of goods; 179 travel arrangement. 180 6.âClass 40âTreatment of materials. 181 7.âClass 41âEducation; providing of training; 182 entertainment; sporting and cultural activities. 183 8.âClass 42âScientific and technological services and 184 research and design relating thereto; industrial analysis and 185 research services; design and development of computer hardware 186 and software. 187 9.âClass 43âServices for providing food and drink; 188 temporary accommodation. 189 10.âClass 44âMedical services; veterinary services; 190 hygienic and beauty care for human beings or animals; 191 agriculture, horticulture and forestry services. 192 11.âClass 45âLegal services; security services for the 193 physical protection of tangible property and individuals; 194 personal and social services rendered by others to meet the 195 needs of individuals. 196 (c)âCertification and collective membership marks: 197 1.âClass 200âCollective membership marks. 198 2.âClass AâCertification marks for goods. 199 3.âClass BâCertification marks for services. 200 (d)âThe goods and services recited in collective trademark 201 and collective service mark applications are assigned to the 202 same classes that are appropriate for those goods and services 203 in general. 204 Section 2.âSection 495.0315, Florida Statutes, is created 205 to read: 206 495.0315âOnline application for registration.â 207 (1)âThe department shall establish and maintain a secure 208 Internet website that allows an applicant to submit an online 209 trademark registration application in accordance with ss. 210 495.031 and 495.035 and a renewal application in accordance with 211 s. 495.071. The website must safeguard the applicantâs 212 information to ensure data integrity and allow the applicant to: 213 (a)âProvide an electronic version of a required specimen of 214 use. 215 (b)âProvide an electronic version of a drawing of the mark. 216 (c)âPay the fee required by s. 495.191. 217 (d)âComplete the verification required by s. 495.031(5). 218 (2)âThe department shall make the online application system 219 required by this section available no later than July 1, 2027. 220 Section 3.âSubsections (5) and (6) of section 495.031, 221 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 222 495.031âApplication for registration.â 223 (5)âEvery application under this section shall be signed 224 and verified by the applicant or by a member of the firm or an 225 officer or other authorized representative of the business 226 entity applying. Verification must be made in accordance with s. 227 92.525. 228 (6)âEvery paper application under this section shall be 229 accompanied by three specimens or facsimiles showing the mark as 230 actually used. Every online application under this section must 231 be accompanied by an electronic copy of a specimen, complying 232 with the requirements of the department, showing the mark as 233 actually used. 234 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.